sl-SI: Vrsta pogonskega sredstva: 134a; CO2; Zeleni plin (Green Gas); HPA; Brez (vzmetno ali električno); Propan; Drugo
zh-CN: 推进剂类型: 134a; CO2; 绿气; 高压空气 (HPA); 无（弹簧或电动）; 丙烷; 其他
de: Art des Treibmittels: 134a; CO2; Green Gas; HPA; Keine (Feder oder elektrisch); Propan; Sonstige
nl: Drijfgas type: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Geen (veer of elektrisch); Propaan; Anders
da: Drivmiddeltype: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Ingen (fjeder eller elektrisk); Propan; Anden
ja: 推進剤の種類: 134a; CO2; グリーンガス; HPA; なし (スプリングまたは電動); プロパン; その他
bg-BG: Вид на горивния газ: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Няма (пружина или електричество); Пропан; Друго
zh-TW: 推進劑類型: 134a; CO2; 環保瓦斯; HPA; 無 (彈簧或電動); 丙烷; 其他
sk-SK: Typ pohonnej hmoty: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Žiadny (pružinový alebo elektrický); Propán; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta pogonskog goriva: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Ništa (opruga ili elektrika); Propan; Ostalo
ko: 추진제 유형: 134a; CO2; 그린 가스; HPA; 없음(스프링 또는 전동); 프로판; 기타
el: Τύπος προωθητικού: 134a; CO2; Πράσινο αέριο; HPA; Κανένα (ελατήριο ή ηλεκτρικό); Προπάνιο; Άλλο
sv: Drivmedelstyp: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Ingen (fjäder eller elektrisk); Propan; Övrigt
cs: Typ pohonné látky: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Žádný (pružinový nebo elektrický); Propan; Ostatní
fi: Ponneaineen tyyppi: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Ei mitään (jousi tai sähkö); Propaani; Muu
ru: Тип топлива: 134a; CO2; Грин-газ; HPA; Нет (пружинный или электрический); Пропан; Другое
tr: İtici gaz türü: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Yok (yaylı veya elektrikli); Propan; Diğer
hu: Hajtógáz típusa: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Nincs (rugós vagy elektromos); Propán; Egyéb
lt-LT: Propelento tipas: 134a; CO2; Žaliosios dujos; HPA; Nėra (spyruoklė arba elektrinis); Propanas; Kita
nb: Drivstofftype: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Ingen (fjær eller elektrisk); Propan; Annet
es: Tipo de propulsor: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Ninguno (de resorte o eléctrico); Propano; Otro
pl: Typ propelentu: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Brak (sprężynowy lub elektryczny); Propan; Inny
it: Tipo di propellente: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Nessuno (a molla o elettrico); Propano; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de propulsor: 134a; CO2; Gás verde; HPA; Nenhum (mola ou elétrico); Propano; Outro
pt-BR: Propelente tipo: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Nenhum (mola ou elétrico); Propano; Outro
th: ประเภทเชื้อเพลิง: 134a; CO2; กรีนแก๊ส; HPA; ไม่มี (สปริงหรือไฟฟ้า); โพรเพน; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại nhiên liệu đẩy: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Không có (lò xo hoặc điện); Khí propan; Khác
ro-RO: Tipul de propulsor: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; Fără (cu arc sau electric); Propan; Altele
fr: Type d’agent propulseur: 134a; CO2; Gaz vert; HPA; Aucun (à ressort ou électrique); Propane; Autre
en: Propellant type: 134a; CO2; Green gas; HPA; None (spring or electric); Propane; Other